Utah statutes.
35A-8-1601.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Board" means the Uintah Basin Revitalization Fund Board.

(2)  "Capital projects" means expenditures for land, improvements on the land, and equipment intended to have long-term beneficial use.

(3)  "County" means:

(a)  Duchesne County; or

(b)  Uintah County.

(4)  "Division" means the Housing and Community Development Division.

(5)  "Revitalization Fund" means the Uintah Basin Revitalization Fund.

(6)  "Tribe" means the Ute Indian Tribe of the Uintah and Ouray Reservation.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 212, 2012 General Session

